intl/locales/bn/hyphenation/hyph_bn.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
2‍2
1‌1
অ1
আ1
ই1
ঈ1
উ1
ঊ1
ঋ1
ৠ1
ঌ1
ৡ1
এ1
ঐ1
ও1
ঔ1
া1
ি1
ী1
ু1
ূ1
ৃ1
ৄ1
ৢ1
ৣ1
ে1
ৈ1
ো1
ৌ1
2়2
ৗ1
1ক
1খ
1গ
1ঘ
1ঙ
1চ
1ছ
1জ
1ঝ
1ঞ
1ট
1ঠ
1ড
1ড়
1ঢ
1ঢ়
1ণ
1ত
1থ
1দ
1ধ
1ন
1প
1ফ
1ব
1ভ
1ম
1য
1য়
1র
1ল
1শ
1ষ
1স
1হ
ৎ1
2ঃ1
2ং1
2ঁ1
2ঽ1
2্2
